Utah statutes.
41-3-407.   Definitions.
As used in Sections 41-3-406 through 41-3-414:
(1)  "Buyback vehicle" means a motor vehicle with an alleged nonconformity
that has been replaced or repurchased by a manufacturer as the result of a
court judgment, arbitration, or any voluntary agreement entered into between
the manufacturer or its agent and a consumer.
(2)  "Consumer" means an individual who has entered into an agreement or
contract for the transfer, lease, or purchase of a new motor vehicle other
than for the purposes of resale, or sublease, during the duration of the
period defined under Section 13-20-5.
(3)  "Manufacturer" means any manufacturer, importer, distributor, or anyone
who is named as the warrantor on an express written warranty on a motor
vehicle.
(4) (a)  "Motor vehicle" includes:
(i)  a motor home, as defined in Section 13-20-2, but only the self-propelled
vehicle and chassis; and
(ii)  a motor vehicle, as defined in Section 41-1a-102.
(b)  "Motor vehicle" does not include:
(i)  those portions of a motor home designated, used, or maintained primarily
as a mobile dwelling, office, or commercial space;
(ii)  farm tractor, motorcycle, road tractor, or truck tractor as defined in
Section 41-1a-102;
(iii)  mobile home as defined in Section 41-1a-102; or
(iv)  any motor vehicle with a gross laden weight of over 12,000 pounds,
except a motor home as defined under Subsection (4)(a)(i).
(5)  "Nonconforming vehicle" means a buyback vehicle that has been
investigated and evaluated pursuant to Title 13, Chapter 20, New Motor
Vehicles Warranties Act, or a similar law of another state or federal
government.
(6) (a)  "Nonconformity" means a defect, malfunction, or condition that fails
to conform to the express warranty, or substantially impairs the use, safety,
or value of a motor vehicle.
(b)  "Nonconformity" does not include a defect, malfunction, or condition that
results from an accident, abuse, neglect, modification, or alteration of a
motor vehicle by a person other than the manufacturer, its authorized agent,
or a dealer.
(7)  "Seller" means any person selling, auctioning, leasing, or exchanging a
motor vehicle.
(8)  "Violation" means each failure to comply with the obligations imposed by
Sections 41-3-406 through 41-3-413. In the case of multiple failures to comply
resulting from a single transaction, each failure to comply is a separate
violation.
